Nebraska, session 109, LB212.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 77-4001, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is amended
to read:
77-4001 Sections 77-4001 to 77-4027 and sections 3 and 5 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Tobacco Products Tax Act.
Sec. 2. Section 77-4002, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is amended to
read:
77-4002 For purposes of the Tobacco Products Tax Act, unless the context
otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 77-4002.01 to 77-4007 and
sections 3 and 5 of this act shall be used.
Sec. 3. (1) Covered tobacco product means cigars, pipe tobacco, or any
other tobacco products as defined in section 77-4007, excluding tobacco
products described in subdivisions (1)(f), (1)(g), (1)(j), and (1)(n) of such
section.
(2) For purposes of this section, pipe tobacco means any of the tobacco
products described in subdivisions (1)(d), (e), (h), and (i) of section
77-4007.
Sec. 4. Section 77-4004, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
77-4004 First owner shall mean any person:
(1) Engaged in the business of selling tobacco products in this state who
brings or causes to be brought into this state from outside this state any
tobacco products for sale in this state, including a retailer who purchases
directly from suppliers outside this state who are not licensed pursuant to
subsection (2) of section 77-4009;
(2) Who makes, manufactures, or fabricates tobacco products in this state
for sale in this state; or
(3) Engaged in business outside this state who ships or transports tobacco
products to retailers in this state and who becomes licensed pursuant to
subsection (2) of section 77-4009; or .
(4) Engaged in business outside this state who makes remote retail sales
of covered tobacco products to consumers in this state and who becomes licensed
pursuant to subsection (3) of section 77-4009.
Sec. 5. Remote retail sale of covered tobacco products means an order for
the sale of a covered tobacco product in which:
(1) A consumer submits the order for the covered tobacco product by
telephone or other method of voice transmission, mail, or the Internet or other
online service;
(2) The retailer is not in the physical presence of the consumer when the
request for the sale is made; and
(3) The retailer:
(a) Delivers the covered tobacco product to the consumer by common
carrier, private delivery service, or other method of remote delivery; or
(b) Is not in the physical presence of the consumer when the consumer
obtains possession of the covered tobacco product.
Sec. 6. Section 77-4009, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
77-4009 (1) Each first owner of tobacco products to be sold in this state
shall be licensed by the Tax Commissioner. Every application for such license
shall be made on a form prescribed by the Tax Commissioner. The application
shall include: (a) The name and address of the applicant or, if the applicant
is a firm, partnership, limited liability company, or association, the name and
address of each of its members or, if the applicant is a corporation, the name
and address of each of its officers and the address of its principal place of
business; (b) the location of the place of business to be licensed; and (c)
such other information as the Tax Commissioner may require for the purpose of
administering the Tobacco Products Tax Act.
(2) A person outside of this state who ships or transports tobacco
products to any person in this state to be sold in this state may make
application for a license and be granted such a license by the Tax
Commissioner. If a license is granted, such person shall be subject to the
Tobacco Products Tax Act and shall be entitled to act as a licensee. A person
outside this state who receives a license shall have established sufficient
contact with this state for the exercise of personal jurisdiction over the
-1-

LB212 LB212
2026 2026
person in any matter or issue arising under the act.
(3) A person outside of this state who makes remote retail sales of
covered tobacco products to consumers in this state shall make application for
a license and be granted such a license by the Tax Commissioner. If a license
is granted, such person shall be subject to the Tobacco Products Tax Act after
making one hundred thousand dollars in sales or two hundred separate sales
transactions of covered tobacco products in the preceding or current calendar
year. A person outside this state who receives a license shall have established
sufficient contact with this state for the exercise of personal jurisdiction
over the person in any matter or issue arising under the act.
Sec. 7. Section 77-4014, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
77-4014 (1) On or before the tenth day of each calendar month, every
person licensed under subsection (1) of section 77-4009 shall file a return
with the Tax Commissioner showing either the quantity and the price of each
tobacco product brought or caused to be brought into this state for sale or the
quantity and the price of each tobacco product made, manufactured, or
fabricated in this state for sale in this state, whichever is applicable,
during the preceding calendar month. For snuff, such return shall also include
the net weight as listed by the manufacturer.
(2) Every person licensed pursuant to subsection (2) of section 77-4009
shall, in the manner described in subsection (1) of this section, file a return
showing in detail the different kinds, quantity, and wholesale sales price of
each tobacco product shipped or transported to retailers in this state to be
sold by such retailers during the preceding calendar month. For snuff, such
return shall also include the net weight as listed by the manufacturer.
(3) On or before the tenth day of each calendar month, every person
licensed pursuant to subsection (3) of section 77-4009 shall, in the manner
described in subsection (1) of this section, file a return showing in detail
the different kinds, quantity, and purchase price paid by each such seller of
each covered tobacco product shipped or transported to consumers in this state
in the preceding calendar month.
(4) (3) Returns shall be made upon forms furnished and prescribed by the
Tax Commissioner. Each return shall be accompanied by a remittance for the full
tax liability shown, less an amount of such liability equal to any amount
allowed a payer of the sales and use tax pursuant to subdivision (1)(d) of
section 77-2708 as compensation to reimburse the licensee for his or her
expenses incurred in complying with the Tobacco Products Tax Act.
Sec. 8. Section 77-4017, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-4017 (1)(a) (1) Every person licensed or certified under the Tobacco
Products Tax Act pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of section 77-4009 shall
keep complete and accurate records for all places of business, including
itemized invoices of tobacco products (i) (a) held, purchased, manufactured, or
brought in or caused to be brought into this state or (ii) (b) for a person
located outside of this state, shipped or transported to retailers in this
state. Such records shall be of sufficient detail to identify the manufacturer
of each tobacco product held, purchased, manufactured, or brought in or caused
to be brought into this state. For snuff, such records shall also include the
net weight as listed by the manufacturer.
(b) Every person licensed under subsection (3) of section 77-4009 shall
keep complete and accurate records for all places of business, including all
itemized invoices of covered tobacco products sold to consumers in this state.
Such persons shall also keep records sufficient to identify the purchase price
of the covered tobacco products paid by the licensee on such invoices.
(2) All books, records, and other papers and documents required to be kept
by this section shall be preserved for a period of at least three years after
the due date of the tax imposed by the Tobacco Products Tax Act unless the Tax
Commissioner, in writing, authorizes their destruction or disposal at an
earlier date.
(3) At any time during usual business hours, duly authorized agents or
employees of the Tax Commissioner may enter any place of business of a person
licensed or certified under the Tobacco Products Tax Act and inspect the
premises, the records required to be kept pursuant to this section, and the
tobacco products contained in such place of business for purposes of
determining whether or not such person is in full compliance with the act.
Refusal to permit such inspection by a duly authorized agent or employee of the
Tax Commissioner shall be grounds for revocation, cancellation, or suspension
of the license or certification.
Sec. 9. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 10. Original sections 77-4004, 77-4009, and 77-4014, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, section 77-4017, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, and sections 77-4001 and 77-4002, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are
repealed.
-2-